Washington statutes.
RCW 5.24.040

Necessity of pleading foreign laws.

This chapter shall not be construed to relieve any party of the duty of hereafter pleading such laws where required under the law and practice of this state.

[ 1981 c 331 s 14; 1941 c 82 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 1281.]

NOTES:

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—Severability—1981 c 331: See notes following RCW 2.32.070.